Maryland, session 2026, SB0948.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
9–305.
(a) A voter may request an absentee ballot by completing and submitting:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0948*

SENATE BILL 948
(1) the State Board approved absentee ballot application;
(2) a form provided under federal law;
(3) subject to subsection (b) of this section, a written request that includes:
(i) the voter’s name, residence address, and signature; and
(ii) the address to which the ballot is to be mailed, if different from
the residence address; or
(4) the accessible online absentee ballot application provided by the State
Board.
(b) A voter who uses the online absentee ballot application to request that an
absentee ballot be sent by any method or who uses any method to request to receive a blank
absentee ballot through the Internet shall provide the following information:
(1) a Maryland driver’s license number or Maryland identification card
number, the last four digits of the applicant’s Social Security number, and other
information identified by the State Board that is not generally available to the public but
is readily available to the applicant; or
(2) if the applicant is an absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter
as defined in the federal Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act or a voter
with a disability and does not have a Maryland driver’s license or Maryland identification
card, the last four digits of the applicant’s Social Security number.
(c) (1) The State–approved absentee ballot application shall include a
statement explaining the process for returning a completed absentee ballot if the voter
chooses to receive an absentee ballot by facsimile transmission or the Internet.
(2) THE ACCESSIBLE ONLINE ABSENTEE BALLOT APPLICATION
SHALL INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING FOR A VOTER WHO CHOOSES TO RECEIVE AN
ABSENTEE BALLOT BY THE INTERNET:
(I) A SEPARATE MODAL BOX THAT PROVIDES A DETAILED
DESCRIPTION OF THE PROCESS FOR OBTAINING, COMPLETING, RETURNING, AND
PROCESSING THE ABSENTEE BALLOT; AND
(II) A DIALOG BOX THAT REQUIRES THE VOTER TO
AFFIRMATIVELY RESPOND THAT THE VOTER UNDERSTANDS THE REQUIREMENTS
AND AGREES TO ACCEPT DELIVERY OF THE ABSENTEE BALLOT BY THE INTERNET.
9–306.

SENATE BILL 948 3
(a) Promptly after receipt of an application, the election director shall review the
application and determine whether the applicant qualifies to vote by absentee ballot.
(b) If the applicant qualifies to vote by absentee ballot, the local board shall
provide the ballot by one of the following methods requested by the voter:
(1) mail;
(2) facsimile transmission;
(3) SUBJECT TO § 9–311.1(D)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR A VOTER ON
PERMANENT ABSENTEE BALLOT STATUS, the Internet; or
(4) by hand during an in–person transaction.
9–311.1.
(a) All voters are eligible for permanent absentee ballot status.
(b) To request permanent absentee ballot status, a voter shall complete and
submit:
(1) the State Board–approved absentee ballot application and indicate on
the form that the voter wishes to have permanent absentee ballot status;
(2) a written request that includes the voter’s name, residence address, and
signature; or
(3) the online absentee ballot application provided by the State Board and
indicate on the form that the voter wishes to have permanent absentee ballot status.
(c) (1) A voter may apply for permanent absentee ballot status at any time.
(2) A voter who requests permanent absentee ballot status may not receive
an absentee ballot for the next election if the request is made after the applicable deadline
specified in § 9–305(c) of this subtitle.
(d) (1) A voter shall specify in an absentee ballot application submitted in
accordance with subsection (b) of this section:
[(1)] (I) one of the following methods by which the voter chooses to receive
an absentee ballot:
[(i)] 1. mail;

SENATE BILL 948
[(ii)] 2. facsimile transmission; or
[(iii)] 3. SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
the Internet; and
[(2)] (II) one of the following methods by which the voter chooses to be
contacted by the State Board under subsection (g) of this section before each election:
[(i)] 1. nonforwardable mail;
[(ii)] 2. e–mail; or
[(iii)] 3. text message.
(2) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY TO:
1. AN ABSENT UNIFORMED SERVICES VOTER OR AN
OVERSEAS VOTER AS DEFINED IN THE FEDERAL UNIFORMED AND OVERSEAS
CITIZENS ABSENTEE VOTING ACT; OR
2. A VOTER USING THE ONLINE BALLOT MARKING TOOL
UNDER § 9–308.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(II) A VOTER WHO REQUESTS PERMANENT ABSENTEE BALLOT
STATUS MAY NOT CHOOSE TO RECEIVE AN ABSENTEE BALLOT BY INTERNET FOR
MORE THAN ONE ELECTION CYCLE.
(e) A voter who uses the online absentee ballot application to request permanent
absentee ballot status or who uses any method to request to receive a blank absentee ballot
through the Internet shall provide the information required under § 9–305(b) of this
subtitle.
(f) A voter who submits a proper request for permanent absentee ballot status
shall be placed on the permanent absentee ballot list.
(g) (1) During the period beginning 120 days before an election and ending 90
days before the election, the State Board shall send a written communication to each voter
who is on the permanent absentee ballot list using the method chosen by the voter under
subsection [(d)(2)] (D)(1)(II) of this section.
(2) The communication required under paragraph (1) of this subsection
shall include:
(i) confirmation that the voter is included on the permanent
absentee ballot list;

SENATE BILL 948 5
(ii) the address of the voter;
(iii) the method by which the voter has chosen to receive an absentee
ballot; and
(iv) a statement that the voter must notify the local board if any of
the changes listed in subsection (j) of this section have occurred.
(3) FOR EACH VOTER WHO HAS CHOSEN TO RECEIVE AN ABSENTEE
BALLOT BY INTERNET UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(1)(I) OF THIS SECTION, THE
COMMUNICATION REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT IS
SENT TO THE VOTER FOR THE ELECTION FOLLOWING THE ELECTION CYCLE FOR
WHICH THE VOTER RECEIVED AN ABSENTEE BALLOT BY INTERNET SHALL REQUIRE
THE VOTER TO CHOOSE A DIFFERENT METHOD FOR RECEIVING AN ABSENTEE
BALLOT FOR THE NEXT ELECTION CYCLE.
[(3)] (4) If the State Board is unable to contact a voter using the method
of communication chosen by the voter under subsection [(d)(2)] (D)(1)(II) of this section,
the State Board shall attempt to contact the voter using another method.
[(4)] (5) If the communication required under paragraph (1) of this
subsection is sent by mail, the envelope shall include a statement, prominently placed,
requesting that the recipient return the communication to the State Board if the intended
recipient no longer lives at that address.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.